Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202676-2207.30
Financial Institutions Reform, Recovery, and Enforcement Act of 1989, defined.

Financial Institutions Reform, Recovery, and Enforcement Act of 1989 means the act as it existed on January 1, 2024.

Laws 2014, LB717, § 8;

R.S.Supp.,2014, § 76-2212.02;

Laws 2015, LB139, § 22;

Laws 2016, LB731, § 3;

R.S.Supp.,2016, § 76-2207.14;

Laws 2018, LB741, § 19;

Laws 2019, LB77, § 2;

Laws 2020, LB808, § 61;

Laws 2021, LB23, § 1;

Laws 2022, LB707, § 50;

Laws 2024, LB992, § 3.